Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 4 Assignment for Benefit of Creditors

10-4-1.
Residence of assignee — Bond.

Every assignee at common law for the benefit of creditors shall be a resident of the state and shall give bond to the clerk of the superior court, with some surety company authorized to do business in this state, as surety, in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000), conditioned on the faithful performance of his or her duties. All such bonds shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court and may be sued upon in the proper court at the relation of any party interested or aggrieved, upon surety for costs being given to the court in which the suit is brought. Joint assignees may give joint or several bonds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1212; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1936, ch. 2390, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 585, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-1

.

10-4-2.
Filing of schedules and lists — Certificate of deed of assignment.

Every person making an assignment at common law for the benefit of creditors shall file with his or her assignee a sworn itemized schedule of all his or her assets, showing the amount and kind of his or her property, where located and the cash value thereof, to the best of his or her knowledge and belief, and a list of his or her creditors, stating their names, residences, and the amounts due each of them, and the evidences thereof and securities therefor, if any, held by them. The sworn itemized schedule and the bond required in §

10-4-1

shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court who shall certify on the deed of assignment that the assignee named in the deed of assignment has complied with the provisions of §

10-4-1

and this section. No city or town clerk shall accept any deed of assignment for record unless it shall bear the certificate of the clerk of the superior court showing compliance with § 10-4-1 and this section, and any deed of assignment which does not bear the certificate showing compliance with § 10-4-1 and this section shall be null and void.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 2; P.L. 1936, ch. 2390, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 595, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-2

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 94.

10-4-3.
Place of filing of papers.

In all proceedings arising under this chapter, whenever the assignor or some one of the assignors is an inhabitant of or located in Providence or Bristol county, the papers shall be filed in the clerk’s office of the superior court in Providence; and whenever the assignor or one of the assignors is an inhabitant of or located in either Newport, Kent, or Washington county, the papers shall be filed in the clerk’s office of the superior court in Newport, East Greenwich, or South Kingstown, respectively.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 9; C.P.A. 1905, § 1214; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 595, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-3

.

10-4-4.
Recording and notice of assignments.

Every assignee under this chapter shall immediately cause the deed of assignment to be recorded in the registry of deeds in each town or city in which there may be real estate of the assignor on which it may operate, and in any event in the registry of deeds of the town or city where the assignor resides or is located, and shall immediately give public notice of his or her qualification, with notice to all creditors to present claims and all debtors to make payments to the assignee, in some newspaper published in the county in which the assignor resides or is located; and the assignee shall immediately also notify creditors by depositing like notice in the United States mail, postpaid, and directed to the creditors at their respective address as they appear in the schedule made by the assignor and filed with the assignee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 595, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-4

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 94.

10-4-5.
Removal or replacement of assignee.

Any assignee under this chapter may be removed by the superior court, for cause shown, upon petition of one-fifth (1/5) in amount of the creditors and upon at least five (5) days’ notice by mail, postpaid, directed to all creditors at their respective addresses and directed to the assignee. In case of the death, resignation, or removal of any assignee, a successor may be appointed by the superior court, upon the petition of any person interested, with like notice, as provided in this section, to all the creditors and to the assignor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 3; C.P.A. 1905, § 1232; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 595, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-5

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 94.

10-4-6.
Effect of assignment on liens.

Every assignment at common law for the benefit of creditors shall be effectual to dissolve any attachment, levy, or lien placed upon the property of the assignor not more than four (4) months prior to the making of the assignment, and the costs in full of the attachment, levy, or lien shall constitute a preferred claim against the assigned estate as part of the costs of administering the trust. The property affected by the attachment, levy, or lien shall be deemed wholly discharged and released from the attachment, levy, or lien and shall pass to the assignee as part of the assigned estate, and the superior court may order such conveyance as may be necessary to carry the purposes of this section into effect; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall have the effect to destroy or impair any title obtained by the attachment, levy, or lien by a bona fide purchaser for value, who shall have acquired the attachment, levy, or lien without notice or reasonable cause of inquiry, or to dissolve, vacate, destroy or impair any lien which exists at common law or any lien for which provision is made in chapter 9 of title 6A, chapter 3 of title 9, chapters 28, 29, 30, 34, or 35 of title 34, or chapter 15 of title 39.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 4; C.P.A. 1905, § 1220; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 4; P.L. 1909, ch. 456, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 595, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-6

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 94.

10-4-7.
Sale of assigned property — Continuation of business — Redemption of property subject to liens.

No assignee under this chapter shall sell any property of his or her assignor, except perishable goods, or in continuation of the business of the assignor in its ordinary course and without power to purchase new stock or to incur other than necessary expense for keeping the business along, without giving at least ten (10) days’ notice to all creditors by mail, postpaid, directed to all creditors at their respective addresses as they appear in the schedule made by the assignor, and stating that the property will be sold at public auction at a given time and place, and the assignee shall also give like notice of such auction sale in some public newspaper published in the town or city, or if none be there published, in some public newspaper published in the county where the auction sale will be held; provided, that private sale at a fixed price may be made by consent of all creditors named in the schedule made by the assignor, or by order of the superior court upon application of the assignee and after like ten (10) days’ notice by mail to such creditors. The assignee may also, upon like consent of the creditors, or like order of the superior court, redeem all mortgages, conditional contracts, pledges, and liens of or upon any property of the assignor conveyed under the assignment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 5; C.P.A. 1905, §§ 1220, 1229; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 595, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-7

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 94.

10-4-8.
Demands for and protection of property by assignee.

The assignee shall demand, sue for, and receive from all persons all the estate in their possession conveyed by the deed of assignment; and the assignee may intervene in any action, suit, or proceeding relating to the property conveyed by the assignment and take upon himself or herself the prosecution or defense thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 595, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-8

.

10-4-9.
Effect on suits and proceedings of death, resignation, or removal of assignee.

No suit or proceeding pending at the time of the death, resignation, or removal of any assignee under this chapter, and to which he or she is a party, shall be abated by his or her death, resignation, or removal, but the suit or proceeding may be proceeded with or defended by his or her joint assignees or assignee or successor, in the same manner as though the suit or proceeding had been begun or was being defended by such joint assignees or assignee alone, or by such successor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 595, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-9

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 94.

10-4-10.
Dividends to creditors — Assignee’s report — Discharge of surety on bond.

No assignee under this chapter at common law for the benefit of creditors shall, except by consent in writing of all the creditors of the assignor, pay any dividend until the expiration of the period of four (4) months from the making of the assignment. In case no petition in bankruptcy or insolvency has been filed within the four (4) month period, the assignee shall complete the administration of the assigned estate as soon as may be, and upon the payment of final dividend shall make itemized sworn report in writing to the superior court of all his or her proceedings under his or her trust; and the court, after at least ten (10) days’ notice by the assignee by mail postpaid, directed to the creditors of the assignor at the respective addresses as they appear in the schedule made by the assignor and filed with the assignee, of the time and place for hearing upon the assignee’s report, shall examine the assignee’s report and hear any parties interested, and upon the expiration of thirty (30) days after the approval of the assignee’s report, or upon a decision approving the assignee’s report by the supreme court upon appeal, or upon certification by the superior court as provided in this chapter, the surety upon any bond of the assignee shall be thereupon discharged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 8; C.P.A. 1905, § 1213; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 595, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-10

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 94.

10-4-11.
Record of proceedings.

The proceedings in all cases under this chapter shall be deemed matters of record; but the proceedings shall not be required to be recorded at large, but shall be filed and numbered in the office of the clerk of the superior court, and a docket only, or short memorandum thereof, shall be kept by the clerk of the supreme court, in books provided for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 9; C.P.A. 1905, § 1214; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 595, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-11

.

10-4-12.
Appeal to supreme court — Certification of questions.

Any party aggrieved by a decision or order of the superior court upon any question arising in any proceedings under this chapter may appeal to the supreme court by claiming the appeal in writing filed with the clerk at any time within thirty (30) days after the entry of the decision or order; and also the court may at once certify any question to the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 9; C.P.A. 1905, § 1214; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 595, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-12

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 94.

10-4-13.
Chancery jurisdiction preserved — Provisions mandatory.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to exclude the additional chancery jurisdiction of the supreme and superior courts. The provisions of this chapter are hereby declared to be mandatory and not directory.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 984, § 10; C.P.A. 1905, § 1218; G.L. 1909, ch. 338, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 389, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 595, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

10-4-13

.